District of Columbia statutes.
49-305

Officers.

All officers shall be commissioned by the President of the United States, on the recommendation of the Commanding General. They shall be nominated as herein provided. No person commissioned as an officer shall assume such rank or enter upon the duties of the office to which he may be commissioned until he has accepted such commission and taken such oath or affirmation as may be prescribed.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 775, ch. 328, § 19
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 630, ch. 146, § 13

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-305.
1973 Ed., § 39-206.